Hawaii statutes.
[PART VI.]
ASSOCIATION ALTERNATE POWER OF SALE

FORECLOSURE
PROCESS

[§667-91] Alternate power of sale
process. The power of sale process in this part is an alternative process
for associations to the foreclosure by action in part IA and the foreclosure by
power of sale in part II. [L 2012, c 182, pt of §3(2)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next